Maryland, session 2025, HB1424.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – State Finance and Procurement
6–226.
(a) (1) Except as otherwise specifically provided by law or by regulation of the
Treasurer, the Treasurer shall credit to the General Fund any interest on or other income
from State money that the Treasurer invests.
(2) (i) 1. This subparagraph does not apply in fiscal years 2024
through 2028.
2. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, and unless
inconsistent with a federal law, grant agreement, or other federal requirement or with the
terms of a gift or settlement agreement, net interest on all State money allocated by the
State Treasurer under this section to special funds or accounts, and otherwise entitled to
receive interest earnings, as accounted for by the Comptroller, shall accrue to the General
Fund of the State.
(ii) The provisions of subparagraph (i) of this paragraph do not apply
to the following funds:
118. the Federal Government [Shutdown] Employee
Assistance Loan Fund;
7–324.
(a) In this section, “Account” means the Catastrophic Event Account.

HOUSE BILL 1424
(b) Subject to the provisions of this section, the Account is established to enable
the State or a local government to respond without undue delay to:
(1) a natural disaster or other catastrophic situation[, or];
(2) federal employee financial hardship from a full or partial federal
government shutdown due to a lapse in federal appropriations that cannot be taken care of
within the resources of existing appropriations; OR
(3) FORMER FEDERAL EMPLOYEE FINANCIAL HARDSHIP FROM THE
CLOSURE, RELOCATION, OR MASS LAYOFF OF A UNIT OF THE FEDERAL
GOVERNMENT, OR OTHER SIMILAR CIRCUMSTANCES.
(c) The Governor may provide an appropriation in the budget bill to the Account.
(d) (1) Subject to paragraph (2) of this subsection, after a 15–day review and
comment period by the Legislative Policy Committee, the Governor may transfer funds by
budget amendment from the Account to the expenditure accounts of the appropriate unit
of State government or unit of local government.
(2) If the federal government is in a full or partial shutdown due to a lapse
in appropriations, after a 2–day review and comment period by the Legislative Policy
Committee, the Governor may transfer funds by budget amendment from the Account to
the Federal Government [Shutdown] Employee Assistance Loan Fund established under §
7–327 of this subtitle.
(e) Funds appropriated to the Catastrophic Event Account:
(1) may not be used to offset operating deficiencies in regular programs of
State government; but
(2) may be expended to assist a unit of State government or unit of local
government in funding costs in connection with:
(I) a natural disaster[,];
(II) a catastrophic situation[, or];
(III) a full or partial federal government shutdown due to a lapse in
appropriations; OR
(IV) A CLOSURE, RELOCATION, OR MASS LAYOFF OF A UNIT OF
THE FEDERAL GOVERNMENT.

HOUSE BILL 1424 5
(f) (1) The Account is a continuing, nonlapsing fund which is not subject to §
7–302 of this subtitle.
(2) The Treasurer shall separately hold, and the Comptroller shall account
for, the Account.
(3) The Account shall be invested and reinvested in the same manner as
other State funds.
(4) Any investment earnings shall be subject to § 7–311(d) of this subtitle.
(g) Money appropriated to the Account does not revert to the Revenue
Stabilization Account.
7–327.
(a) In this section, “Fund” means the Federal Government [Shutdown] Employee
Assistance Loan Fund.
(b) There is a Federal Government [Shutdown] Employee Assistance Loan Fund.
(c) The purpose of the Fund is to provide loans to [employees of the federal
government] STATE RESIDENTS who [are] are:
(1) [required to report to work at a work site located in the State; and
(2)] ARE EMPLOYEES OF THE FEDERAL GOVERNMENT, REQUIRED TO
REPORT TO WORK, AND WHO ARE not being paid because of a full or partial federal
government shutdown due to a lapse in appropriations AFTER JANUARY 1, 2025; OR
(2) IN THE IMMEDIATELY PRECEDING 6 MONTHS, AND ON OR AFTER
JANUARY 1, 2025, WERE TERMINATED FROM EMPLOYMENT BY THE FEDERAL
GOVERNMENT DUE TO THE CLOSURE, RELOCATION, OR MASS LAYOFF OF A UNIT OF
THE FEDERAL GOVERNMENT, OR OTHER SIMILAR CIRCUMSTANCES BEYOND THE
EMPLOYEES’ CONTROL, AND WHO ARE EXPERIENCING FINANCIAL HARDSHIP AS
DETERMINED BY THE MARYLAND DEPARTMENT OF LABOR.
(d) The Maryland Department of Labor shall administer the Fund.
(e) (1) The Fund is a special, nonlapsing fund that is not subject to § 7–302 of
this subtitle that shall be available in perpetuity for the purpose of providing loans in
accordance with the provisions of this section.
(2) The State Treasurer shall hold the Fund separately, and the
Comptroller shall account for the Fund.

HOUSE BILL 1424
(3) THE MARYLAND DEPARTMENT OF LABOR IS AUTHORIZED TO
DISCLOSE INFORMATION TO THIRD–PARTY VENDORS TO VERIFY FEDERAL
EMPLOYMENT FOR THE PURPOSE OF ASSISTING WITH THE IMPLEMENTATION OF THE
FUND, SUBJECT TO PRIVACY CONSIDERATIONS.
(f) The Fund consists of:
(1) money appropriated in the State budget to the Fund;
(2) any interest earnings of the Fund;
(3) money transferred from the Catastrophic Event Account in accordance
with § 7–324 of this subtitle;
(4) repayments on loans made from the Fund; and
(5) any other money from any other source accepted for the benefit of the
Fund.
(g) The Fund shall be used only to provide no–interest loans to [employees of the
federal government] STATE RESIDENTS who [are] are:
(1) [required to report to work at a work site located in the State; and
(2)] ARE EMPLOYEES OF THE FEDERAL GOVERNMENT, REQUIRED TO
REPORT TO WORK, AND WHO ARE not being paid because of a full or partial federal
government shutdown due to a lapse in appropriations AFTER JANUARY 1, 2025; OR
(2) IN THE IMMEDIATELY PRECEDING 6 MONTHS, AND ON OR AFTER
JANUARY 1, 2025, WERE TERMINATED FROM EMPLOYMENT BY THE FEDERAL
GOVERNMENT DUE TO THE CLOSURE, RELOCATION, OR MASS LAYOFF OF A UNIT OF
THE FEDERAL GOVERNMENT, OR OTHER SIMILAR CIRCUMSTANCES BEYOND THE
EMPLOYEES’ CONTROL, AND WHO ARE EXPERIENCING FINANCIAL HARDSHIP AS
DETERMINED BY THE MARYLAND DEPARTMENT OF LABOR.
(h) (1) The State Treasurer shall invest the money of the Fund in the same
manner as other State money may be invested.
(2) Any interest earnings of the Fund shall be credited to the Fund.
(i) (1) Subject to paragraph (2) of this subsection, the Maryland Department
of Labor shall establish procedures and eligibility criteria for loans from the Fund.
(2) The eligibility criteria shall include that:

HOUSE BILL 1424 7
(i) 1. the federal government is in a full or partial shutdown due
to a lapse in appropriations; OR
2. A UNIT OF THE FEDERAL GOVERNMENT HAS BEEN
CLOSED, BEEN RELOCATED, EXPERIENCED MASS LAYOFFS, OR EXPERIENCED
OTHER SIMILAR CIRCUMSTANCES; and
(ii) an individual applying for a loan from the Fund is, A RESIDENT
OF THE STATE WHO IS:
1. A RESIDENT OF THE STATE; AND
2. A. 1. an employee of the federal government WHO IS,
REQUIRED TO REPORT TO WORK, AND NOT BEING PAID BECAUSE OF THE FULL OR
PARTIAL FEDERAL GOVERNMENT SHUTDOWN DUE TO THE LAPSE IN
APPROPRIATIONS AFTER JANUARY 1, 2025; OR
[2. required to report to work at a work site located in the
State; and
3. not being paid because of the full or partial federal
government shutdown due to the lapse in appropriations]
B. 2. A FORMER EMPLOYEE OF THE FEDERAL
GOVERNMENT WHO, WITHIN THE 6 MONTHS IMMEDIATELY PRECEDING THE DATE OF
THE LOAN APPLICATION, AND ON OR AFTER JANUARY 1, 2025, WAS TERMINATED
FROM EMPLOYMENT BY THE FEDERAL GOVERNMENT DUE TO THE CLOSURE,
RELOCATION, OR MASS LAYOFF OF A UNIT OF THE FEDERAL GOVERNMENT, OR
OTHER SIMILAR CIRCUMSTANCES BEYOND THE INDIVIDUAL’S CONTROL, AND WHO
IS EXPERIENCING FINANCIAL HARDSHIP AS DETERMINED BY THE MARYLAND
DEPARTMENT OF LABOR.
(3) THE MARYLAND DEPARTMENT OF LABOR MAY ESTABLISH OTHER
CRITERIA TO BEST ASSIST FEDERAL EMPLOYEES FACING FINANCIAL HARDSHIP.
(3) (4) The procedures shall include:
(i) application procedures;
(ii) payment procedures from the Fund; and
(iii) IF REPAYMENT IS REQUIRED, repayment procedures, including
timelines, for an individual to repay a loan from the Fund.

HOUSE BILL 1424
(4) (5) THE MARYLAND DEPARTMENT OF LABOR MAY FORGIVE A
LOAN PROVIDED UNDER THIS SECTION.
Article – State Government
6–106.1.
(a) The General Assembly finds that:
(1) the federal government’s action or failure to take action may pose a
threat to the health and welfare of the residents of the State; and
(2) the State should investigate and obtain relief from any arbitrary,
unlawful, or unconstitutional federal action or inaction and prevent such action or inaction
from harming the residents of the State.
(b) (1) In addition to any other powers and duties and subject to the
requirements of this subsection, the Attorney General may investigate, commence, and
prosecute or defend any civil or criminal suit or action that is based on the federal
government’s action or inaction that threatens the public interest and welfare of the
residents of the State with respect to:
(i) protecting the health of the residents of the State and ensuring
the availability of affordable health care;
(ii) safeguarding public safety and security;
(iii) protecting civil liberties;
(iv) preserving and enhancing the economic security of workers and
retirees;
(v) protecting financial security of the residents of the State,
including their pensions, savings, and investments, and ensuring fairness in mortgages,
student loans, and the marketplace;
(vi) protecting the residents of the State against fraud and other
deceptive and predatory practices;
(vii) protecting the natural resources and environment of the State;
(viii) protecting the residents of the State against illegal and
unconstitutional federal immigration and travel restrictions; [or]
(IX) PROTECTING RESIDENTS OF THE STATE WHO ARE
EMPLOYEES OF THE FEDERAL GOVERNMENT WHO ARE NOT BEING PAID BECAUSE OF

HOUSE BILL 1424 9
A FULL OR PARTIAL FEDERAL GOVERNMENT SHUTDOWN DUE TO A LAPSE IN
APPROPRIATIONS;
(X) PROTECTING RESIDENTS OF THE STATE WHO WERE
EMPLOYEES OF THE FEDERAL GOVERNMENT, AND ON OR AFTER JANUARY 1, 2025:
1. WERE TERMINATED FROM EMPLOYMENT BY THE
FEDERAL GOVERNMENT DUE TO THE CLOSURE, RELOCATION, OR MASS LAYOFF OF
A UNIT OF THE FEDERAL GOVERNMENT, OR OTHER SIMILAR CIRCUMSTANCES
BEYOND THE EMPLOYEES’ CONTROL; OR
2. SEPARATED FROM EMPLOYMENT BY THE FEDERAL
GOVERNMENT AS A RESULT OF A VOLUNTARY SEPARATION INCENTIVE PAYMENT;
(XI) PROTECTING RESIDENTS OF THE STATE WHO ARE
INAPPROPRIATELY DENIED FEDERAL BENEFITS THAT THEY HAVE EARNED,
INCLUDING SOCIAL SECURITY BENEFITS, MEDICARE, AND VETERANS AFFAIRS
BENEFITS;
(XII) PROTECTING RESIDENTS OF THE STATE WHO ARE
INAPPROPRIATELY DENIED FEDERAL ENTITLEMENTS, INCLUDING MEDICAID; OR
[(ix)] (XI) (XIII) otherwise protecting, as parens patriae, the State’s
interest in the general health and well–being of its residents.
(2) Except as provided in paragraph (4) of this subsection, before
commencing a suit or an action under paragraph (1) of this subsection, the Attorney
General shall provide to the Governor:
(i) written notice of the intended suit or action; and
(ii) an opportunity to review and comment on the intended suit or
action.
(3) If the Governor objects to the intended suit or action for which notice
was provided under this subsection:
(i) the Governor shall provide in writing to the Attorney General the
reasons for the objection within 10 days after receiving the notice; and
(ii) except as provided in paragraph (4) of this subsection, the
Attorney General shall consider the Governor’s objection before commencing the suit or
action.

HOUSE BILL 1424
(4) If the Attorney General determines that emergency circumstances
require the immediate commencement of a suit or an action under paragraph (1) of this
subsection, the Attorney General shall provide to the Governor notice of the suit or action
as soon as reasonably practicable.
(c) The Governor’s proposed budget for fiscal year 2019, and for each fiscal year
thereafter, shall appropriate at least [$1,000,000] $2,500,000 to the Attorney General to
be used only for:
(1) carrying out this section; and
(2) employing [five] attorneys in the Office of the Attorney General.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That the Laws of Maryland read
as follows:
Article – State Personnel and Pensions
1–101.
(a) In this Division I of this article the following words have the meanings
indicated.
(b) “Appointing authority” means an individual or a unit of government that has
the power to make appointments and terminate employment.
(f) Unless expressly provided otherwise, “Department” means the Department of
Budget and Management.
(j) “Position” means an employment assignment of duties and responsibilities that
requires the full–time employment of one individual or less than full–time employment of
one or more individuals.
(k) “Principal unit” means:
(1) a principal department or other principal independent unit of State
government; or
(2) for an employee of a county board of elections whose employees are
covered by this article, the county board of elections.
(m) “Secretary” means the Secretary of Budget and Management.
(p) “State Personnel Management System” means the personnel system established
under § 6–101 of this article.

HOUSE BILL 1424 11
7–201.1.
(A) IN THIS SECTION, “PROGRAM” MEANS THE EXPEDITED HIRING
PROGRAM IN THE DEPARTMENT.
(B) (1) THERE IS AN EXPEDITED HIRING PROGRAM IN THE DEPARTMENT
FOR THE PURPOSE OF HIRING ELIGIBLE APPLICANTS FOR VACANT POSITIONS IN THE
STATE PERSONNEL MANAGEMENT SYSTEM SUBJECT TO THE REQUIREMENTS OF
THIS SECTION.
(2) SUBJECT TO THE AVAILABILITY OF FUNDS, THE SECRETARY MAY
CONTRACT WITH ANOTHER ENTITY TO ASSIST WITH THE IMPLEMENTATION OF THE
PROGRAM.
(C) NOTWITHSTANDING ANY OTHER PROVISION OF THIS SUBTITLE, AN
APPOINTING AUTHORITY:
(1) MAY RECRUIT FOR A VACANT POSITION IN ACCORDANCE WITH
THIS SECTION; AND
(2) SHALL AIM TO COMPLETE THE RECRUITMENT FOR THE POSITION
WITHIN 40 DAYS.
(D) AN ELIGIBLE APPLICANT FOR THE PROGRAM SHALL BE AN INDIVIDUAL
APPLYING FOR A VACANT POSITION IN STATE GOVERNMENT WHO:
(1) SELF–CERTIFIES AND, ON REQUEST, PROVIDES DOCUMENTATION
THAT THE INDIVIDUAL:
(I) HAS SERVED IN THE FEDERAL GOVERNMENT IN ANY
CAPACITY, INCLUDING DURING A PROBATIONARY PERIOD; AND
(II) LEFT FEDERAL SERVICE AFTER JANUARY 15, 2025; AND
(2) HAS RELEVANT FEDERAL EXPERTISE OR EXPERIENCE TO MEET
THE REQUIREMENTS, BASED ON THE POSITION DESCRIPTION, FOR THE VACANT
STATE POSITION.
(E) THE PROGRAM SHALL:
(1) DEVELOP GUIDANCE FOR APPOINTING AUTHORITIES ON ALIGNING
JOB TITLES AND POSITION DESCRIPTIONS WITH THE FEDERAL EQUIVALENT
POSITIONS WITHOUT REQUIRING SUBSTANTIVE CHANGES TO THE DESCRIPTIONS OR
CLASSIFICATIONS OF THE POSITIONS;

HOUSE BILL 1424
(2) CONDUCT MARKETING AND RECRUITMENT ACTIVITIES TO
RECRUIT ELIGIBLE APPLICANTS FOR VACANT POSITIONS;
(3) RATE THE QUALIFICATIONS OF EACH APPLICANT WHILE A VACANT
POSITION IS OPEN;
(4) COMMUNICATE WITH APPLICANTS THROUGHOUT THE HIRING
PROCESS TO MAINTAIN THE APPLICANTS’ INTEREST IN THE POSITION;
(5) DEVELOP A PROCESS TO REFER APPLICANTS TO OTHER VACANT
POSITIONS IN STATE GOVERNMENT; AND
(6) EXPLORE OPPORTUNITIES TO EXPAND THE PROGRAM TO
SUPPORT HIRING BY INTERESTED COUNTY GOVERNMENTS.
(F) THE SECRETARY SHALL:
(1) IMPLEMENT THE PROGRAM IN PHASES, WITH INITIAL FOCUS ON
CRITICAL AND HARD–TO–FILL POSITIONS, AS DETERMINED BY THE SECRETARY;
(2) ESTABLISH REASONABLE TIMELINES FOR EACH PHASE OF
IMPLEMENTATION; AND
(3) ADOPT REGULATIONS TO:
(I) IMPLEMENT THE PROGRAM; AND
(II) REVISE THE CONDITIONS FOR ELIGIBILITY UNDER
SUBSECTION (D) OF THIS SECTION TO INCLUDE REVIEW OF APPLICATIONS FROM
FORMER FEDERAL CONTRACTORS.
SECTION 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That the Laws of Maryland read
as follows:
Article – Tax – General
13–203.
(c) Subject to subsections (f) and (g) of this section, tax information may be
disclosed to:
(17) the Maryland Cannabis Administration; [and]

HOUSE BILL 1424 13
(18) a person, governmental entity, or tax compliance organization for the
purpose of assisting the Comptroller in tax compliance activity; AND
(19) THE MARYLAND DEPARTMENT OF LABOR TO THE EXTENT
NECESSARY TO:
(I) ADMINISTER THE FEDERAL GOVERNMENT EMPLOYEE
ASSISTANCE LOAN FUND UNDER § 7–327 OF THE STATE FINANCE AND
PROCUREMENT ARTICLE; OR
(II) DETECT AND PREVENT FRAUDULENT CLAIMS FOR RELIEF OR
AVOIDANCE OF REPAYMENT REQUIRED UNDER § 7–327 OF THE STATE FINANCE AND
PROCUREMENT ARTICLE.
SECTION 4. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That:
(a) The Maryland Department of Labor shall conduct research and analysis on
foreclosure activity in Maryland, particularly as it relates to federal workers, to include, to
the extent practicable, federal contractors impacted by layoffs since January 1, 2025.
(b) On or before December 31, 2025, the Maryland Department of Labor shall
report to the General Assembly, in accordance with § 2–1257 of the State Government Article,
on any data findings or trend analysis as it relates to foreclosures in Maryland for this
worker population.
SECTION 2. 5. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That:
(a) Notwithstanding § 7–311(i) of the State Finance and Procurement Article,
after providing the Legislative Policy Committee with at least 7 days to review and
comment, the Governor may transfer up to $5,000,000 from the Revenue Stabilization
Account under § 7–311 of the State Finance and Procurement Article to the Federal
Government Employee Assistance Loan Fund under § 7–327 of the State Finance and
Procurement Article, as enacted by Section 1 of this Act.
(b) Notwithstanding § 7–311(i) of the State Finance and Procurement Article,
after providing the Legislative Policy Committee with at least 7 days to review and
comment, the Governor may transfer up to $1,500,000 from the Revenue Stabilization
Account under § 7–311 of the State Finance and Procurement Article to the expenditure
accounts of the Attorney General to fund costs associated with carrying out § 6–106.1 of the
State Government Article, as enacted by Section 1 of this Act.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2025.
SECTION 3. 6. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act is an emergency
measure, is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public health or safety, has

HOUSE BILL 1424
been passed by a yea and nay vote supported by three–fifths of all the members elected to
each of the two Houses of the General Assembly, and shall take effect from the date it is
enacted. Section 2 of this Act shall remain effective through June April 30, 2025 2026, and
at the end of June April 30, 2025 2026, Section 2 of this Act, with no further action required
by the General Assembly, shall be abrogated and of no further force and effect. Section 5 of
this Act shall remain effective through June 30, 2025, and, at the end of June 30, 2025,
Section 5 of this Act, with no further action required by the General Assembly, shall be
abrogated and of no further force and effect.
Approved:
________________________________________________________________________________
Governor.
________________________________________________________________________________
Speaker of the House of Delegates.
________________________________________________________________________________
President of the Senate.